Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 12 Industrial Development and Siting
§ 35-12-109.
Application for permit; form; fee; financial accounting.

An application for a permit shall be filed with the division, in a form as prescribed by council rules and regulations, and shall contain the following information:

The name and address of the applicant, and, if the applicant is a partnership, association or corporation, the names and addresses of the managers designated by the applicant responsible for permitting, construction or operation of the facility;

The applicant shall state that to its best knowledge and belief the application is complete when filed and includes all the information required by W.S.

35-12-109

and the rules and regulations, except for any requirements specifically waived by the council pursuant to W.S.

35-12-107

;

A description of the nature and location of the facility;

Estimated time of commencement of construction and construction time;

Estimated number and job classifications, by calendar quarter, of employees of the applicant, or contractor or subcontractor of the applicant, during the construction phase and during the operating life of the facility. Estimates shall include the number of employees who will be utilized but who do not currently reside within the area to be affected by the facility;

Future additions and modifications to the facility which the applicant may wish to be approved in the permit;

A statement of why the proposed location was selected;

A copy of any studies which may have been made of the environmental impact of the facility;

Inventory of estimated discharges including physical, chemical, biological and radiological characteristics;

Inventory of estimated emissions and proposed methods of control;

Inventory of estimated solid wastes and proposed disposal program;

The procedures proposed to avoid constituting a public nuisance, endangering the public health and safety, human or animal life, property, wildlife or plant life, or recreational facilities which may be adversely affected by the estimated emissions or discharges;

An evaluation of potential impacts together with any plans and proposals for alleviating social and economic impacts upon local governments or special districts and alleviating environmental impacts which may result from the proposed facility. The evaluations, plans and proposals shall cover the following:

Scenic resources;

Recreational resources;

Archaeological and historical resources;

Land use patterns;

Economic base;

Housing;

Transportation;

Sewer and water facilities;

Solid waste facilities;

Police and fire facilities;

Educational facilities;

Health and hospital facilities;

Water supply;

Other relevant areas;

Agriculture;

Terrestrial and aquatic wildlife;

Threatened, endangered and rare species and other species of concern identified in the state wildlife action plan as prepared by the Wyoming game and fish department.

Estimated construction cost of the facility;

What other local, state or federal permits and approvals are required;

Compatibility of the facility with state or local land use plans, if any;

Any other information the applicant considers relevant or required by council rule or regulation;

A description of the methods and strategies the applicant will use to maximize employment and utilization of the existing local or in-state contractors and labor force during the construction and operation of the facility;

Certification that the governing bodies of all local governments which will be primarily affected by the proposed facility were provided notification, a description of the proposed project and an opportunity to ask the applicant questions at least thirty (30) days prior to submission of the application;

For facilities permitted pursuant to W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), a site reclamation and decommissioning plan, which shall be updated every five (5) years, and a description of a financial assurance plan which will assure that all facilities will be properly reclaimed and decommissioned. All such plans, unless otherwise exempt, shall demonstrate compliance with any rules or regulations adopted by the council pursuant to W.S. 35-12-105(d) and (e);

Information demonstrating the applicant’s financial capability to decommission and reclaim the facility. For facilities meeting the definition of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G) the information shall also demonstrate the applicant’s financial capability to construct, maintain and operate the facility;

For proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), a list of all affected landowners with an address at which each affected landowner can be given the notices required by this act.

At the time of filing an application or a written request for a waiver of the application provisions of this chapter as provided in W.S.

35-12-107

, or as subsequently required by the director, an applicant shall pay a fee to be determined by the director based upon the estimated cost of investigating, reviewing, processing and serving notice of an application, holding a hearing in case of a request for waiver, inspection and compliance activities and processing application update requests. The fee shall be credited to a separate account and shall be used by the division as required to investigate, review, process and serve notice of the application, to hold a hearing in case of a request for waiver and to pay the reasonable costs of any meeting or hearing associated with permit compliance. Unused fees shall be refunded to the applicant. The maximum fee chargeable shall not exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the estimated construction cost of the facility or one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00), whichever is less.

The director shall provide the applicant with a full financial accounting, including but not limited to all materials, labor and overhead costs relating to the expenditures of the fee at the time of the council’s decision as provided in W.S.

35-12-113

or at the completion of construction, whichever occurs later.

At any time after the fee required by subsection (b) of this section has been exhausted or refunded and in addition to the fee imposed under subsection (b) of this section, the applicant may be required to pay a fee, as determined by the director, for the costs of any meeting or hearing associated with permit compliance. The director shall provide the applicant with a full financial accounting for the expenditure of the fee, including but not limited to all materials, labor and overhead costs, at the conclusion of the council meeting or hearing.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 35-502.81, 35-502.83; Laws 1977, ch. 66, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§

35-12-108

,

35-12-110

; Laws 1985, ch. 177, § 1; 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 47, §§ 1, 3; 2011, ch. 146, § 1; 2012, ch. 50, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (b).

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), added (a)(xiii)(Q) through (a)(xiii)(S), substituted “other local, state” for “other state” in (a)(xv), and added (a)(xix) through (a)(xxi); in (b), inserted “, inspection and compliance activities and processing application update requests,” and inserted “and to pay the reasonable costs of any meeting or hearing associated with permit compliance”; in (c), inserted “or at the completion of construction, whichever occurs later”; added (d); and made related and stylistic changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(xxii).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted “construct, maintain, operate” preceding “decommission” and added the second sentence in (a)(xxi).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(xx) and (a)(xxii) substituted “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F)”; and in (a)(xxi) substituted “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(xiii)(I) or (a)(xiii)(L) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-12-110.
Service of notice of application; information and recommendations; application deficiencies; procedure; jurisdiction; hearing.

Not more than ten (10) days following receipt of an application for a permit, the director shall:

Serve an electronic or physical copy of the application upon the governing bodies of local governments which will be primarily affected by the proposed facility together with notice of the applicable provisions of W.S.

35-12-111

and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), serve a copy of the application with notice of the applicable provisions of W.S.

35-12-111

upon affected landowners;

Cause a summary of the application to be published in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be primarily affected by the proposed facility;

File a copy of the application with the county clerk of the county or counties in which the proposed facility will be constructed.

The division shall obtain information and recommendations from the following state agencies relative to the impact of the proposed facility as it applies to each agency’s area of expertise:

Wyoming department of transportation;

Public service commission;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Game and fish department;

Department of health;

Department of education;

Office of state engineer;

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

Wyoming state geologist;

Wyoming department of agriculture;

Department of environmental quality;

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

The University of Wyoming;

Department of revenue;

The Wyoming business council;

Department of workforce services;

Office of state lands and investments;

Department of workforce services;

Department of state parks and cultural resources;

Department of fire prevention and electrical safety;

Department of family services;

Oil and gas conservation commission.

The information required by subsection (b) of this section shall be provided by the agency from which it is requested not more than sixty (60) days from the date the request is made and shall include opinions as to the advisability of granting or denying the permit together with reasons therefor, and recommendations regarding appropriate conditions to include in a permit, but only as to the areas within the expertise of the agency. Each agency which has regulatory authority over the proposed facility shall provide to the council a statement defining the extent of that agency’s jurisdiction to regulate impacts from the facility, including a statement of the agency’s capability to address cumulative impacts of the facility in conjunction with other facilities. The statement of jurisdiction from each agency is binding on the council.

On receipt of an application, the director shall conduct a review of the application to determine if it contains all the information required by W.S.

35-12-109

and the rules and regulations. If the director determines that the application is incomplete, he shall within thirty (30) days of receipt of the application notify the applicant of the specific deficiencies in the application. The applicant shall provide the additional information necessary within thirty (30) days of a receipt of a request for additional information from the director.

Upon receipt of the additional information specified in subsection (d) of this section, the director shall either notify the applicant that the application is complete or notify the applicant of continued deficiencies. The applicant shall provide the required information within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the notice of continued deficiency. Upon receipt of the second deficiency notice, the applicant may:

Provide the required information within the time allotted; or

Withdraw the application.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 2.

Not more than ninety (90) days after receipt of an application for a permit, the director shall:

Schedule and conduct a public hearing, provided that no hearing shall be held until the state engineer has submitted a preliminary and final opinion as to the quantity of water available for the proposed facility pursuant to W.S.

35-12-108

;

Notify the applicant and local governments of the hearing and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), notify affected landowners;

Cause notice of the hearing to be published in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be primarily affected by the proposed facility; and

Hold the hearing at a community as close as practicable to the proposed facility. The provisions of W.S.

35-12-111

,

35-12-112

and

35-12-114

apply to the hearing.

For proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G):

The division shall request information and recommendations from affected landowners relative to the impact of the proposed facility as it applies to each affected landowner’s lands and interests;

Not less than twenty-five (25) days prior to any scheduled hearing on the application, the director shall provide to all affected landowners a copy of all information received from agencies providing information under subsections (b) and (c) of this section; and

Agencies providing opinions and recommendations under subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall receive comments from affected landowners and shall provide a summary of all affected landowner comments with other information submitted. If comments are received after the agency’s other information is submitted, the comments shall be forwarded when received to the division.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 35-502.82, 35-502.84; Laws 1977, ch. 66, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§

35-12-109

,

35-12-111

; Laws 1986, ch. 105, § 1; 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; ch. 221, § 2; ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 60, §§ 3, 4; 1998, ch. 6, §§ 3, 5; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2010, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 146, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

through

1-6-204

.

As to creation of board of agriculture, see §

11-2-101

.

The 2006 amendment,

added “and” at the end of (b)(xv); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “an electronic or physical copy” for “notice,” and “together with the notice of” for “and the notice shall refer to”; added (b)(xvii) through (xxiii); and repealed former (e)(iii), pertaining to applicant electing not to provide required information; and made related changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(i), added “and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F), serve a copy of the application with notice of the applicable provisions of W.S.

35-12-111

upon affected landowners,” and made stylistic changes; in (f)(ii), added “and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F), notify affected landowners”; and added (g).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (b)(xix).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i), (f)(ii), and the introductory language of (g) substituted “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides:

“[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Concern with collective welfare of inhabitants of area. —

The industrial siting council is to be concerned with the collective, not individual, social and economic welfare of present and expected inhabitants of the areas of site influence. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978).

May grant application to build but withhold permit for transmission lines. —

There is no statutory barrier to the industrial siting council's granting of an application to build a generating plant, while withholding a permit for transmission lines until further study can be made concerning them. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978).

Purpose of subsection (f)(iv). —

Subsection (f)(iv), under which all hearings on facilities as proposed by an electric power cooperative are required to be held “at a community as close as practicable to the proposed facility,” is designed to prevent the situation in which the hearing is held at a considerable distance from the area affected by the development. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 35-12-111.
Parties to permit proceeding; waiver by failure to participate.

The parties to a permit proceeding include:

The applicant;

Each local government entitled to receive a copy of the application under W.S. 35-12-110(a)(i);

Any person residing in a local government entitled to receive a copy of the application under W.S. 35-12-110(a)(i) including any person holding record title to lands directly affected by construction of the facility and any nonprofit organization with a Wyoming chapter, concerned in whole or in part to promote conservation or natural beauty, to protect the environment, personal health or other biological values, to preserve historical sites, to promote consumer interests, to represent commercial, agricultural and industrial groups, or to promote the orderly development of the areas in which the facility is to be located. In order to be a party the person or organization must file with the office a notice of intent to be a party not less than twenty (20) days before the date set for the hearing.

Any party identified in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section waives his right to be a party if he does not participate orally at the hearing. Any party identified in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section waives its right to be a party unless the local government files a notice of intent to be a party with the office not less than twenty (20) days before the date set for the hearing.

Any person may make a limited appearance in the proceeding by filing a statement in writing with the council prior to adjournment of the hearing. A statement filed by a person making a limited appearance shall become part of the record and shall be made available to the public. No person making a limited appearance under this subsection is a party to the proceeding.

No state agency other than the industrial siting division shall act as a party at the hearing. Members and employees of all other state agencies and departments may file written comments prior to adjournment of the hearing but may testify at the hearing only at the request of the council, the industrial siting division or any party.

Any person described in W.S. 35-12-111(a)(ii) or (iii) who participated in the public hearing under W.S.

35-12-107

may obtain judicial review of a council decision waiving all or part of the application requirements of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.85; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-112

, Laws 1986, ch. 105, § 1; 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2010, ch. 47, § 1; 2011, ch. 146, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “to receive a copy” for “to receive service of a copy” in (a)(ii) and (a)(iii), and inserted “including any person holding record title to lands directly affected by construction of the facility” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iii), added “agricultural.”

§ 35-12-112.
Record of hearing; procedure.

Any studies, investigations, reports or other documentary evidence, including those prepared by the division, which any party wishes the council to consider or which the council itself expects to utilize or rely upon, shall be made a part of the record. A complete record shall be made of the hearing and of all testimony taken. The contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act apply to the hearing under W.S. 35-12-110(f), but do not apply to the hearing under W.S.

35-12-107

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.86; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-113

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Transcript deemed part of record of proceedings. —

A transcript of a tape recording of a public meeting of the industrial siting council held to discuss a decision of the council is a part of the record of the proceedings in a contested case under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, as incorporated in this section. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 35-12-113.
Decision of council; findings necessary for permit conditions imposed; service of decision on parties; waste management surcharge.

Within forty-five (45) days from the date of completion of the hearing the council shall make complete findings, issue an opinion and render a decision upon the record, either granting or denying the application as filed, or granting it upon terms, conditions or modifications of the construction, operation or maintenance of the facility as the council deems appropriate. The council shall not consider the imposition of conditions which address impacts within the area of jurisdiction of any other regulatory agency in this state as described in the information provided in W.S. 35-12-110(b), unless the other regulatory agency requests that conditions be imposed. In considering the imposition of conditions requested by other agencies upon private lands, the council shall consider in the same manner and to the same extent any comments presented by an affected landowner. The council may consider direct or cumulative impacts not within the area of jurisdiction of another regulatory agency in this state. The council shall grant a permit either as proposed or as modified by the council if it finds and determines that:

The proposed facility complies with all applicable law;

The facility will not pose a threat of serious injury to the environment nor to the social and economic condition or inhabitants or expected inhabitants in the affected area;

The facility will not substantially impair the health, safety or welfare of the inhabitants; and

The applicant has financial resources to decommission and reclaim the facility. For facilities meeting the definition of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) the council shall also be required to find the applicant has financial resources to construct, maintain and operate the facility.

No permit shall be granted if the application is incomplete.

If the council determines that the location of all or part of the proposed facility should be modified, it may condition its permit upon that modification, provided that the local governments, and persons residing therein, affected by the modification, have been given reasonable notice of the modification.

The council shall issue with its decision, an opinion stating in detail its reasons for the decision. If the council decides to grant a permit for the facility, it shall issue the permit embodying the terms and conditions in detail, including the time specified to commence construction, which time shall be determined by the council’s decision as to the reasonable capability of the local government, most substantially affected by the proposed facility, to implement the necessary procedures to alleviate the impact. A copy of the decision shall be served upon each party.

A permit may be issued conditioned upon the applicant furnishing a bond to the division in an amount determined by the director from which local governments may recover expenditures in preparation for impact to be caused by a facility if the permit holder does not complete the facility proposed. The permit holder is not liable under the bond if the holder is prevented from completing the facility proposed by circumstances beyond his control.

Within ten (10) days from the date of the council’s decision, a copy of the findings and the council’s decision shall be served upon the applicant, parties to the hearing and local governments to be substantially affected by the proposed facility and filed with the county clerk of the county or counties to be primarily affected by the proposed facility. Notice of the decision shall be published in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be affected by the proposed facility.

Each approved facility enumerated under W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(A) through (D) shall, on a quarterly basis, remit to the division a waste management surcharge to be deposited in the general fund. The surcharge amount is:

A minimum of ten dollars ($10.00) per short ton of solid wastes, including radioactive wastes, received at the facility, less a minimum of five dollars ($5.00) for each short ton of solid wastes removed at the facility and recycled or reused and less any amount credited against the surcharge pursuant to W.S. 35-11-503(b)(iv)(B); and

A minimum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per short ton of hazardous wastes received at the facility, less a minimum of three dollars ($3.00) for each short ton of hazardous wastes treated at the facility to reduce toxicity and long-term hazards to the environment.

For applicants subject to W.S. 35-12-105(e), a permit may be issued conditioned upon the applicant furnishing a bond or other financial assurance acceptable to the division in an amount determined by the director to cover the cost of decommissioning and reclaiming the facility.

The council may deny an application if the facility that is the subject of the application will unreasonably interfere with the development of a known and currently economically developable mineral resource within the proposed facility.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 35-502.82, 35-502.87; W.S. 1977, §§

35-12-109

,

35-12-114

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1989, ch. 180, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; ch 88, § 1; 1996, ch. 60, § 1; 2010, ch. 47, § 1; 2011, ch. 146, § 1; 2012, ch. 50, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

through

1-6-204

.

For procedure relating to service generally, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

The 2010 amendment,

added (a)(iv); added (h); and made related changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), added the present third sentence.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted “construct, maintain, operate” preceding “decommission” and added the second sentence in (a)(iv).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (j).

Complete record to be kept. —

Both the Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 3 of title 16) and this section require the keeping of a complete record. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 35-12-114.
Review of grant or denial of permit.

Any party as defined in W.S.

35-12-111

aggrieved by the final decision of the council on an application for a permit may obtain judicial review by the filing of a petition in any state district court in which the major portion of the proposed facility is to be located within thirty (30) days after the issuance of a final decision. The petition for appeal by any party must include an express assumption of the cost of preparation of the complete written transcripts and record for the court. Upon receipt of a petition, the division shall deliver to the court a copy of the complete written transcript of the record of the proceeding before it and a copy of the council’s decision and opinion entered therein which shall constitute the record on judicial review. At the same time the division shall deliver to the petitioner an itemized statement of the cost of preparing the complete written transcript and record for the court. The petitioner shall pay the division this cost within forty-five (45) days or forfeit the right to appeal to district court. A copy of the transcript, decision and opinion shall remain on file with the division and shall be available for public inspection.

When a decision is issued after a hearing on an application for a permit, the decision is final for purposes of judicial review. The judicial review procedure shall be the same as that for contested cases under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.88; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-115

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Official determination of industrial siting council is expressed in formal findings

of fact and conclusions of law, and it is that action only which is to be tested upon review under the law; it cannot be impeached by reliance upon the dialogue of a public decisional meeting. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978).

Supported by substantial evidence. —

For purposes of review, the findings of the industrial siting council must be supported by substantial evidence; that is, there must be present such relevant evidence as might lead a reasonable mind to the conclusion manifested in the questioned finding. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978).

Jurisdictional challenge. —

By rule, the industrial siting council (ISC) has created a procedure apart from the permit process by which its jurisdiction over the construction of an industrial facility may be challenged. Under it, the ISC jurisdiction may be challenged by filing an application for a certificate of insufficient jurisdiction. The district court has jurisdiction to entertain an appeal from the denial of a certificate of insufficient jurisdiction by the ISC. Industrial Siting Council v. Chicago & N.W. Transp. Co., 660 P.2d 776,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 35-12-115.
Additional requirements by other governmental agencies not permitted after issuance of permit; exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no state, intrastate regional agency or local government may require any approval, consent, permit, certificate or other condition for the construction, operation or maintenance of a facility authorized by a permit issued pursuant to this chapter except that:

The department of environmental quality shall retain authority which it has or which it may be granted to determine compliance of the proposed facility with state and federal standards and implementation plans and to enforce those standards; and

The public service commission shall retain authority which it has or may be granted relative to certificates of convenience and necessity, rates, interchange of services and safety regulations.

Nothing in this chapter prevents the application of state laws for the protection of employees engaged in the construction, operation or maintenance of any facility specified in this section.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.89; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-116

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2.

§ 35-12-116.
Revocation or suspension of permit.

A permit may be revoked or suspended for:

Any material false statement in the application or in accompanying statements or studies required of the applicant, if a true statement would have warranted the council’s refusal to grant a permit;

Failure to comply with the terms or conditions of the permit after notice of the failure from the office and reasonable opportunity to correct the failure; or

Violation of this chapter, the regulations issued pursuant to this chapter or orders of the council or office.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.90; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-117

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-12-117.
Monitoring of facilities.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the council and the division, utilizing to the fullest extent possible the staff and resources of all state agencies, boards and commissions, has continuing authority and responsibility for:

Monitoring the operations of all facilities which have been granted permits under this chapter;

Assuring continuing compliance with this chapter and permits issued pursuant to this chapter; and

Discovering and preventing noncompliance with this chapter and the permits.

The department of environmental quality has exclusive continuing authority and responsibility for monitoring and assuring compliance with:

Laws and regulations pertaining to air, water and land quality, and solid waste management; and

Any permit conditions ordered by the council relating to matters of air, water and land quality, and solid waste management.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.91; Laws 1977, ch. 66, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-118

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

§ 35-12-118.
Penalties for violations; civil action by attorney general.

No person shall:

Commence to construct a facility after the effective date of this chapter without first obtaining a permit required under this chapter;

Construct, operate or maintain a facility, after having first obtained a permit, other than in specific compliance with the permit;

Cause any of the acts specified in this subsection to occur;

Operate or maintain an industrial facility without having first obtained the permit required under this chapter.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section is liable to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate offense. The penalty shall be recoverable in a civil suit brought by the attorney general on behalf of the state in the district court in and for the county of Laramie.

Whoever knowingly and willfully violates subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate offense.

In addition to any penalty provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section, if the director determines that a person is violating this section, he shall refer the matter to the attorney general who may bring a civil action on behalf of the state in the district court in and for the county of Laramie for injunctive or other appropriate relief against the violation and to enforce this chapter or a permit issued under this chapter, and upon a proper showing a permanent or preliminary injunction or temporary restraining order shall be granted without bond.

All fines collected pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.92; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-119

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2005, ch. 157, § 2; 2010, ch. 47, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

” for “deposited in the state general fund” in (e).

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The 2010 amendment,

added (a)(iv), and made related changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.